District of Columbia statutes.
21-2073

Preservation of estate plan; right to examine.

In investing the estate, selecting assets of the estate for distribution under section 21-2071 , and utilizing powers of revocation or withdrawal available for the support of the protected individual and exercisable by the conservator or the court, the conservator and the court shall take into account any estate plan of the protected individual known to them, including a will, any revocable trust of which the individual is settlor, and any contract, transfer, or joint ownership arrangement originated by the protected individual with provisions for payment or transfer of benefits or interests at the individual’s death to another. The conservator may examine the will of the protected individual.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
1981 Ed., § 21-2073.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-326 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).